Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 279C.560 is amended to read:
279C.560. (1)(a) [ Unless a  contracting agency that reserves an amount as retainage under ORS
279C.570 (7) finds in writing that accepting a bond or instrument described in paragraph (a)  or (b) of
this subsection poses an extraordinary risk that is not  typically associated with the bond or instrument,
the] A contractor may submit  and a  contracting agency shall accept from a contractor  in lieu
of withholding moneys [ from payment shall accept from a contractor ] for all  or a portion of the
retainage required under a public contract :
[(a)] (A)  Bonds, securities or other instruments of a character described in subsection (6) of this
section that are deposited as provided in subsection (4) of this section; or
[(b)] (B)  A surety bond deposited as provided in subsection (7) of this section.
(b) A surety bond that a contractor  submits under this section must be executed by a
surety bonding company that is authorized to transact surety business in this state and may
not be a surety obligation of an individual.
(c) A contracting agency may reject  bonds, securities or other instruments that a con-
tractor submits under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection or a  surety bond that the con-
tractor submits under paragraph (a)(B) of  this subsection only if the contracting agency first
finds in writing good cause for the rejection that is based on unique project circumstances.
(2) A contracting agency that holds moneys as retainage under ORS 279C.570 (7) shall:
(a) Hold the moneys in a fund and  pay the moneys to the contractor in accordance with ORS
279C.570; or
(b) At the election of the contractor, pay the  moneys to the contractor in accordance with
subsection (4) or (5) of this section and in a manner authorized by the Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services.
(3)(a) If [ the] a  contracting agency incurs additional costs as a result of the  contractor’s  ex-
ercise  of  an option described in subsection (1) , (4)  or (5) of this section, the contracting agency may
recover the  additional costs from the contractor by reducing the final payment. As work on the
contract progresses, the contracting  agency shall, upon demand, inform the contractor of all accrued
costs.
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-A) Page 1
(b) Except as provided  in subsection (8) of this section, a contractor shall bear additional
costs that arise from the contractor’s exercise of an option described in  subsection (1), (4)
or (5) of this section that the contractor incurs after the date on which the contractor  sub-
mits a bid or proposal to the contracting agency.  These costs are not reimbursable project
costs and the contracting agency is not responsible for paying these costs.
(4) [ The] A  contractor  may deposit bonds, securities or other instruments with [ the] a contract-
ing agency or in a  bank or [ trust company ] other financial institution  for the contracting agency
to hold for the  contracting agency’s benefit in lieu of moneys held as retainage. If [ the contracting
agency accepts ] a contractor submits  bonds, securities or other instruments [ deposited] as provided
in this subsection, the contracting agency  shall reduce the moneys held as retainage in an amount
equal to the value of the  bonds, securities and other instruments and pay the amount of the re-
duction to the contractor in accordance with ORS 279C.570. Interest or earnings on the  bonds, se-
curities or other instruments [ shall] accrue to the contractor.
(5) If the contractor elects, the contracting agency shall deposit the retainage [ as
accumulated], as the retainage accumulates,  in  an interest-bearing account in a bank[ , savings
bank, trust company or savings association ] or other financial  institution  for the benefit of the
contracting agency. [ When] If  the contracting agency  is a state contracting agency, the account
must be established through  the State Treasurer. Earnings on the account accrue to the contractor.
(6) Bonds, securities and other instruments  deposited or acquired in lieu of retainage, as per-
mitted by this section, must be of a  character approved by the Director of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, including but not limited to:
(a) Bills, certificates, notes or bonds of the United States.
(b) Other obligations of the United States or agencies of the United States.
(c) Obligations of a corporation wholly owned by the federal government.
(d) Indebtedness of the Federal National Mortgage Association.
(e) General obligation bonds of the State of Oregon or a political subdivision of the State  of
Oregon.
(f) Irrevocable letters of credit issued by an insured institution, as defined in ORS 706.008.
(7) [The] A  contractor[ , with the approval of the contracting agency, ] may deposit a surety bond
for all or any portion of the amount of funds retained, or to be retained, by the  contracting agency
in [ a form acceptable to  the contracting agency ] substantially the form specified in ORS 701.435
(4). The  surety  bond and any proceeds of the  surety  bond  must be made subject to all claims and
liens and in the same manner and priority  [as set forth ] specified for retainage under ORS 279C.550
to 279C.570 and 279C.600 to 279C.625. The contracting agency shall reduce the moneys  the con-
tracting agency holds as retainage in an amount equal to  the value of the  surety  bond and pay the
amount of the reduction to the contractor in accordance with ORS 279C.570. [Whenever  a con-
tracting agency accepts a surety bond from a contractor in lieu of retainage, the contractor shall  accept
like bonds from a subcontractor or supplier from which the contractor has retainage.  The contractor
shall then reduce the moneys the contractor holds as retainage in an amount equal to the value  of the
bond and pay the amount of the reduction to the subcontractor or supplier. ]
(8)(a) When a contracting agency accepts a surety  bond in lieu of retainage from a con-
tractor under this section, the contractor shall accept surety  bonds from subcontractors or
suppliers from which the contractor has withheld retainage. At any time  before final pay-
ment on a public improvement contract, a subcontractor may submit a surety bond  to a
contractor and request that the contractor on the public improvement contract submit, in
the manner provided in subsection (7) of this section, a surety bond to  the contracting
agency for the portion of the contractor’s retainage that pertains to the subcontractor.  The
surety bond the  subcontractor provides to the contractor must meet the requirements set
forth in subsection (1)(b) of this  section. When a contractor at a subcontractor’s request
obtains and submits to the contracting agency a  surety bond under this subsection, the
contractor may withhold from payments to  the subcontractor an amount equivalent to the
portion of the contractor’s surety bond premium for  which the subcontractor is responsible.
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-A) Page 2
(b) Within 30 days after  a subcontractor’s request under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the contractor shall provide, and the contracting agency shall accept, a surety bond  that
meets the requirements set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section unless:
(A) The contracting agency finds good cause in writing to reject  the surety bond based
on unique project circumstances;
(B) The surety bond is not commercially available; or
(C) The subcontractor refuses to  pay to the contractor the subcontractor’s portion of the
surety bond premium or refuses to provide the contractor with a surety  bond that meets the
requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(c) A surety bond the subcontractor submits under this subsection, and any  proceeds
from the surety bond, must be made subject to all claims and liens and in  the same manner
and priority specified for retainage under ORS 279C.550 to 279C.570 and 279C.600 to 279C.625.
(d) A contracting agency  shall, within 30 days after receiving a surety bond under this
subsection, release to  the contractor an amount the contracting agency holds as retainage
that is equivalent to the amount the contractor submitted as a surety bond.
(e) A contractor must, within 30 days after receiving a surety bond  from a subcontractor
or supplier, release to the subcontractor or supplier the  amount the contractor holds as
retainage that is equivalent to the amount the subcontractor  or supplier submitted as the
surety bond.
(9) A surety bond under this section must be in substantially the form specified  in ORS
701.435 (4).
SECTION 2.
 ORS 279C.570 is amended to read:
279C.570. (1) [ It is ] The policy of the State of Oregon  is  that all payments due on a public im-
provement contract and owed by a contracting  agency [ shall] must  be paid promptly. No contract-
ing agency is exempt from the provisions of this section.
(2) Contracting agencies shall make progress payments  on the contract monthly as work
progresses on a public improvement contract. Payments shall  be based upon estimates of work
completed that are approved by the contracting agency.  A progress payment is not considered ac-
ceptance or approval of any  work or waiver of any defects therein. The contracting agency shall
pay to the  contractor interest on the progress payment, not including retainage, due the contractor.
The interest  shall commence 30 days after receipt of the invoice from the contractor or 15 days after
the payment is approved by  the contracting agency, whichever is the earlier date. The rate of in-
terest charged to the contracting agency  on the amount due shall equal three times the discount
rate on 90-day commercial paper in effect at the  Federal Reserve Bank in the Federal Reserve dis-
trict that includes  Oregon on the date that is 30 days after receipt of the invoice from the con-
tractor or 15 days after the payment is approved  by the contracting agency, whichever is the earlier
date, but the rate of interest may  not exceed 30 percent. [ If the contract price exceeds $500,000, the
contracting agency shall place amounts deducted  as retainage into an interest-bearing escrow account.
Interest on the retainage amount accrues from the date the payment request is approved until the  date
the retainage is paid to the contractor to which it is due. ]
(3) Interest shall be paid automatically when payments become overdue. The contracting  agency
shall document, calculate and pay  any interest due when payment is made on the principal. Interest
payments shall accompany payment of net due on public improvement contracts. The contracting
agency may not require  the contractor to petition, invoice, bill or wait additional days to receive
interest due.
(4) [ When] If  an invoice is filled out incorrectly, [ when] if there is any defect or impropriety in
any submitted invoice or [ when] if  there is a good faith dispute, the contracting agency shall  so
notify the contractor within 15 days stating  the reason or reasons the invoice is defective or im-
proper or the reasons for  the dispute. A defective or improper invoice, if corrected by the contractor
within seven days of  being notified by the contracting agency, may not cause a payment to be made
later than specified in this section unless interest is also paid.
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-A) Page 3
(5) If requested in writing by a  first-tier subcontractor, the contractor, within 10 days after re-
ceiving the request, shall send to the first-tier subcontractor a  copy of that portion of any invoice,
request for payment submitted to the contracting agency or pay document provided by  the con-
tracting agency to the contractor specifically related to any labor or  materials supplied by the
first-tier subcontractor.
(6) Payment of interest may  be postponed when payment on the principal is delayed because of
disagreement between the contracting agency and the contractor. Whenever  a contractor brings
formal administrative or judicial action to collect interest due under this section,  the prevailing
party is entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees.
(7) A contracting agency may reserve as retainage from any progress payment on a public  im-
provement contract an amount not to exceed five percent of the  payment. As work progresses, a
contracting agency may reduce the amount of the retainage  and the contracting agency may elimi-
nate retainage on any remaining monthly contract payments  after 50 percent of the work under the
contract is completed if, in the contracting agency’s opinion,  such work is progressing satisfactorily.
Elimination or reduction  of retainage shall be allowed only upon written application by the con-
tractor,  and the application shall include written approval of the contractor’s surety. However, when
the contract work is  97.5 percent completed the contracting agency may, at the contracting agency’s
discretion and without application by the contractor, reduce the retained  amount to 100 percent of
the value of the contract work remaining to be done. Upon receipt of a written  application by the
contractor, the contracting agency shall respond in writing within a reasonable time.
(8) The  retainage held by a contracting agency [ shall] must  be included in and paid to the
contractor as part of  the final payment of the contract price. The contracting agency shall pay to
the contractor interest at the rate of 1.5 percent  per month on the final payment due the contractor,
interest to commence 30 days after the work under the contract has been completed  and accepted
and to run until the date when the final payment is tendered to the  contractor. The contractor shall
notify the contracting agency in writing when the contractor considers  the work complete and the
contracting agency shall,  within 15 days after receiving the written notice, either accept the work
or notify the contractor of work yet to be performed on the contract. If the  contracting agency does
not, within the  time allowed, notify the contractor of work yet to be performed to fulfill contractual
obligations, the interest provided by  this subsection shall commence to run 30 days after the end
of the 15-day period.
(9)(a) The contracting agency shall pay, upon settlement or judgment in favor of the  contractor
regarding any dispute as to the compensation due a contractor  for work performed under the terms
of a public improvement contract, the amount due plus interest  at the rate of two times the discount
rate, but not to exceed 30 percent, on 90-day commercial paper in  effect at the Federal Reserve
Bank in the Federal Reserve district that includes Oregon on the date of the settlement or judgment,
and accruing from the later of:
(A) The due date of any progress payment received under the  contract for the period in which
such work was performed; or
(B) Thirty days after the date on which the claim for the payment under dispute was  presented
to the contracting agency by the contractor in writing  or in accordance with applicable provisions
of the contract.
(b) Interest shall be added to and not made a part of the settlement or judgment.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 701.420 is amended to read:
701.420. (1) Partial payment is allowed and may be  made on contracts for construction and home
improvement. An owner, contractor or subcontractor may  withhold as retainage an amount equal
to not more than five percent of the contract price of the  work completed. Partial payment allowed
under this subsection is not acceptance or approval of some of the work or a waiver of  defects in
the work.
[(2)(a)] (2) The owner, contractor or subcontractor shall pay interest at the rate of one percent
per month on  the final payment due the contractor or subcontractor. The interest shall commence
30 days after the contractor or subcontractor  has completed and the owner has accepted the work
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-A) Page 4
under the contract for construction for which the final payment is due. The interest shall run until
the date when final payment is tendered to the contractor or subcontractor. When  the contractor
or subcontractor considers the  work that the contractor or subcontractor is contracted to perform
to be complete, the contractor  or subcontractor shall notify the party to whom the contractor or
subcontractor is responsible for performing the  construction work under the contract. The party
shall, within 15 days after receiving the notice, either accept the work or notify the contractor  or
subcontractor of work yet to be performed under the contract.  If the party does not accept the work
or does not notify the contractor or  subcontractor of work yet to be performed within the time al-
lowed, the interest required under this subsection shall commence 30  days after the end of the
15-day period.
[(b) If the contract price exceeds $500,000, the owner, contractor or subcontractor  shall place
amounts withheld as retainage  into an interest-bearing escrow account. Interest on the retainage
amount accrues from the date the payment request is approved until the date the retainage is paid  to
the contractor or subcontractor to which it is due. ]
(3) When a contractor pays a subcontractor in full, including  the amount the contractor with-
held as retainage, the owner with whom the contractor has  the contract shall pay the contractor,
out of the amount that the owner withheld from the contractor  as retainage, a sum equal to the
amount of retainage that the contractor paid the subcontractor.  The contractor shall notify the
owner when the contractor pays a subcontractor in full under this section  and the owner shall,
within 15 days  after receiving the notice, pay the contractor the amount due the contractor under
this subsection. Interest on the amount due the contractor at the rate of one percent per  month
shall commence 30 days after the owner receives notice of full payment to the subcontractor.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 701.435 is amended to read:
701.435. [(1) When a contractor on a public contract deposits bonds, securities or other instruments
under ORS 279C.560 (4), if the subcontract price exceeds $50,000 and constitutes  more than 10 percent
of the cost of the public contract,  a subcontractor on the public contract may deposit bonds, securities
or other instruments with the contractor or in a bank or trust company for the contractor  to hold for
the contractor’s benefit in lieu of moneys held as retainage. If the  contractor accepts the bonds, secu-
rities or other instruments deposited as provided in this subsection, the  contractor shall reduce the
moneys held as retainage in an amount equal to the value of the bonds, securities and other instruments
and pay the amount of the reduction to the subcontractor in accordance  with ORS 701.420 and 701.430.
Interest or earnings on the bonds, securities or other instruments shall accrue to the subcontractor. ]
(1)(a) A contractor  that performs work on a large commercial structure or under a
public improvement contract may submit  to the project owner and any lender, and the owner
and lender shall accept, a surety bond  in lieu of all or any portion of the retainage required
for the large commercial structure or under the public improvement contract.
(b) When an owner and any lender accept a surety bond in lieu of retainage from a  con-
tractor under this section, the  contractor shall accept surety bonds from subcontractors or
suppliers from which the  contractor has withheld retainage. At any time before final pay-
ment for work on  a large commercial structure or under a public improvement contract, a
subcontractor may submit  a surety bond to the contractor on the large commercial struc-
ture or under the public improvement contract and request  that the contractor submit a
surety bond to the project owner and  any lender for the portion of the contractor’s retainage
that pertains to the subcontractor. The surety bond must be from  a surety bonding company
that is authorized to transact business in this state and may not be a surety obligation  of
an individual. The surety bond  the subcontractor submits to the contractor must be in sub-
stantially the form specified in subsection  (4) of this section. When a contractor at the
subcontractor’s request obtains and  submits to the owner and any lender a surety bond un-
der this subsection,  the contractor may withhold from payments to the subcontractor an
amount equivalent to the portion of the contractor’s surety bond premium for which  the
subcontractor is responsible.
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-A) Page 5
(c) Within 30 days after a  subcontractor’s request under paragraph (b) of this subsection,
the contractor shall provide, and the owner  and any lender shall accept, a surety bond that
meets the requirements set forth in this subsection unless:
(A) The surety bond is not commercially available; or
(B) The subcontractor  refuses to pay to the contractor the subcontractor’s portion of the
surety bond premium or refuses to provide the contractor with a surety  bond that meets the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) A surety bond the contractor submits under this subsection, and any proceeds from
the surety bond, are subject to all claims  and liens and in the same manner and priority
specified for retainage under this section and ORS  279C.550 to 279C.570, 279C.600 to 279C.625
and 701.420, as applicable.
(e) An owner  and any lender shall, within 30 days after receiving a surety bond under this
subsection, release to the contractor an amount the owner and lender hold as retainage that
is equivalent to the amount the contractor submitted as a surety bond.
(f) The  contractor must, within 30 days after receiving a surety bond from a subcon-
tractor or supplier, reduce  the amount the contractor holds as retainage in an amount
equivalent to the amount the subcontractor or supplier submitted as a surety bond and shall
pay the amount of the reduction to the subcontractor or  supplier in accordance with ORS
701.420 and 701.430.
(2) [ When a contractor on a public contract elects to have the public contracting agency deposit the
accumulated retainage in an interest-bearing account under ORS 279C.560  (5),] If a contractor or a
subcontractor performing work on a large commercial structure or  under a public improve-
ment contract does not deposit a surety bond in lieu  of retainage, the contractor may elect
to have the project owner or contracting agency deposit accumulated  retainage in an
interest-bearing account with a bank or other financial institution or pay  interest on the
accumulated retainage at the rate of two percent  plus the discount rate on 90-day commer-
cial paper that is in effect  at the Federal Reserve Bank in the Federal Reserve district that
includes this state on the date that the retainage is  paid. Subject to subsection (3) of this
section, if the contractor elects to have accumulated retainage pay interest,  the contractor,
within 30 days following payment of the final amount due for construction of the  project or  public
improvement, shall pay to each subcontractor [ who] that  performed work on the construction  the
subcontractor’s proportional share of the interest earnings that accrued to the contractor as a result
of the election. A subcontractor’s  share of the total amount of interest earnings under this sub-
section [ shall] must  be  determined by the proportion that the amount of retainage withheld from
the subcontractor bears to the amount of retainage withheld from  the contractor and the length of
time the retainage was withheld from the subcontractor.  A share of the interest earnings shall be
paid to a subcontractor under this subsection only when:
(a) Retainage is withheld from the subcontractor for more than 60 days after  the day on which
the first partial payment was due the subcontractor under the terms of the subcontract; and
(b) The amount of interest earnings due the subcontractor exceeds $100.
(3) If [ the] a contractor incurs additional costs as a result of the exercise of an option described
in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the contractor may recover  the  additional costs from the
subcontractor by reducing the final payment. As work on the subcontract  progresses, the contractor
shall, upon demand, inform the subcontractor of all accrued additional costs.
[(4) Bonds, securities and other instruments deposited or acquired  in lieu of retainage, as permitted
by this section, must be of a character  approved by the Director of the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services, including but not limited to: ]
[(a) Bills, certificates, notes or bonds of the United States. ]
[(b) Other obligations of the United States or agencies of the United States. ]
[(c) Obligations of a corporation wholly owned by the federal government. ]
[(d) Indebtedness of the Federal National Mortgage Association. ]
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-A) Page 6
[(e) General obligation bonds of the State of Oregon or a political subdivision of  the State of
Oregon.]
[(f) Irrevocable letters of credit issued by an insured institution, as defined in ORS 706.008. ]
(4) A surety bond  under this section and ORS 279C.560 must be in substantially the fol-
lowing form:
RETAINAGE SURETY BOND
KNOW ALL BY THESE PRESENTS: That , a
authorized to do business in the State of Oregon, as  Principal, and , a
corporation organized and existing under the laws of  the State of  and
authorized to transact the business  of surety in the State of Oregon, as Surety, are jointly
and severally held and  bound to  (“Obligee”)
and (“Owner”), and their lenders,  heirs, executors, administrators,
successors and assigns in the penal sum of $ , plus  % (not
more than five  percent) of any increases in the contract amount that may occur because of
change orders or increases in the quantities of or that addition of any new item of work.
WHEREAS the Principal has  executed a contract for with the
Obligee; and
WHEREAS Oregon law allows the  Obligee to withhold from the Principal a sum equiv-
alent to  % (not more than five percent) from  moneys the Principal earns on es-
timates or progress payments during the progress of the work  (“Earned Retained Funds”);
and
WHEREAS  the  Principal has requested that the Obligee or Owner accept a surety bond
in lieu of Earned Retained Funds as allowed under ORS 279C.560 or 701.435;
NOW, THEREFORE, this obligation  is such that the Surety and the Surety’s successors
and assigns  are held and bound to Obligee, Owner and any lender, and to all beneficiaries for
the sum set forth in the first paragraph of this retainage surety bond.  This surety bond and
any proceeds from this surety  bond are subject to all claims and liens by the Obligee against
the Principal in the same manner and priority as specified  for retainage under ORS 279C.550
to 279C.570, 279C.600 to 279C.625 and  701.420, as applicable. The condition of this obligation
is such that if the Principal  satisfies all payment obligations to any Obligee that may lawfully
claim against project sums due to the Principal and indemnify and hold the Obligee  harmless
from any and all loss, costs and damages that the Obligee may sustain by release of  the
retainage to the Principal or Surety, this obligation  is null and void if the Obligee notifies
the Surety that the  Obligee released the obligation. The obligation otherwise remains in full
force and effect.
IT IS HEREBY DECLARED AND AGREED that the Surety is liable under this  obligation
in the same manner and  to the same extent as is Principal. The Surety will not be discharged
or released from  liability for any act, omission or defense of any kind or nature that would
not also discharge the Principal.
IT IS HEREBY FURTHER DECLARED AND AGREED that  this obligation is binding
upon and inures to the benefit of the  Principal, the Surety, the Obligee, the Owner, any
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-A) Page 7
lender and the beneficiaries of this obligation and their respective heirs, executors,  admin-
istrators, successors and assigns.
SIGNED AND SEALED this  day of , 20
Principal Surety 
Name Name 
Title Title 
Address Address 
City/State/Zip City/State/Zip 
Phone Phone 
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS  279C.560, 279C.570, 701.420 and 701.435 by sections
1 to 4 of this 2024 Act apply to contracts into which  a contractor or subcontractor enters
on and after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 13, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 26, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-A) Page 8